public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
akuar/A
realdir/A
amar/A
reanemar/A
arđentar/A
armiđar/A
inasprir/A
aŧionar/A
inaxenir/A
badanar/A
xbaɉar/A
trabalar/A
xbalinar/A
inbalŧar/A
arbandonar/A
barar/A
barbotar/A
xbaroŧar/A
bastonar/A
batocar/A
inbavar/A
befar/A
xbeletar/A
xbertonar/A
bevaŧar/A
xbianŧar/A
abinar/A
birar/A
bivakar/A
xbocar/A
xboɉentar/A
bolar/A
xbolŧar/A
sorabondar/A
bordeđar/A
inboskar/A
boŧar/A
brakiđar/A
bragolar/A
xbrasar/A
dexbraxolar/A
inbrijar/A
inbrojar/A
xbroketar/A
xbrufar/A
bruxar/A
inbulir/A
butar/A
buxinar/A
carir/A
cefar/A
inkoncèñer/A
decéñer/A
skoncetar/A
cipegar/A
incukar/A
damaskar/A
defamar/A
dexdeñar/A
devorŧiar/A
dixdisiar/A
dixertar/A
adolorar/A
kondonar/A
adorar/A
indotar/A
dubitar/A
prodúxer/A
đavariar/A
dexđónxer/A
đugatolar/A
edukar/A
ensir/A
riesir/A
exalar/A
exonerar/A
rarefar/A
afadegar/A
defalkar/A
fameɉar/A
faoređar/A
fatuar/A
favoriđar/A
mañifegar/A
verifegar/A
sfénder/A
inferar/A
deskonfermar/A
arfiar/A
infiankar/A
desfibiar/A
refifar/A
sfilar/A
skonfinar/A
sfiorar/A
fiscar/A
subafitar/A
fodrar/A
sfojar/A
fondar/A
forbir/A
informaɉar/A
forŧar/A
fradelar/A
sfranpuñar/A
infraskar/A
defraudar/A
fregolar/A
infrincar/A
frondeđar/A
frutuar/A
fumar/A
furfar/A
fuxilar/A
galdir/A
ingamelar/A
xgangolir/A
ingarbelar/A
xgarofolar/A
ingavasar/A
globolar/A
xgomentar/A
xgorbiar/A
dexgradar/A
dexgranar/A
xgranelar/A
dexgrasar/A
dexagravar/A
ingrejar/A
dexgreŧiar/A
ingriñolir/A
grixolir/A
ingrosir/A
dexguantar/A
guarantir/A
guidar/A
dexgustar/A
ilkamar/A
induxiar/A
ingoxar/A
rinproverar/A
integrar/A
intrajar/A
istansiar/A
joŧolar/A
inɉavetar/A
ɉetar/A
ɉubilar/A
akàder/A
kagar/A
skaldar/A
rekalkar/A
kalpestar/A
kaluñar/A
skanar/A
inkanelar/A
kanpar/A
inkantexemar/A
inkapar/A
rekapitar/A
inkapuŧar/A
karenar/A
skarnir/A
kartar/A
deskartoŧar/A
kaskar/A
katalogar/A
katekiđar/A
prekaŧar/A
rekavar/A
kavilar/A
inkinar/A
inkodegar/A
deskoɉonar/A
kolar/A
inkolorir/A
rekomandar/A
deskomodar/A
konéter/A
konkuasar/A
konpasar/A
konsumar/A
inkontrar/A
konvojar/A
akorar/A
sokórer/A
inkordar/A
korèxer/A
inkorporar/A
kospetonar/A
inkoŧar/A
rekòxer/A
skrepolar/A
skrikar/A
krokolar/A
krostolar/A
kuacar/A
skuaɉar/A
interkuerar/A
deskuinternar/A
skukar/A
kuñir/A
traskurar/A
skuxar/A
lanbikar/A
lanŧar/A
xlargar/A
xlatar/A
xlavinar/A
relèđer/A
leñar/A
levar/A
xlexierir/A
ligar/A
limegar/A
lisegar/A
traxlokar/A
xlonbar/A
xloŧar/A
dexlubiar/A
dexluviar/A
madurar/A
magrar/A
maliŧiar/A
mandar/A
inmanetar/A
mantekar/A
xmarar/A
mareɉar/A
xmartelar/A
mascar/A
inmaskerar/A
matiđar/A
maurar/A
medegar/A
xmegolar/A
xmenar/A
dementir/A
xmerdar/A
améter/A
ométer/A
mexonar/A
minaŧar/A
remirar/A
remodernar/A
xmokaɉar/A
moltonar/A
montar/A
mónxer/A
morbidir/A
xmoroxar/A
xmorŧar/A
mòver/A
inmucarar/A
inmurar/A
inmuxonar/A
dexnaxolar/A
ninegar/A
renovar/A
xñinfar/A
okelar/A
onđar/A
orđar/A
ospitar/A
inpadronir/A
inpalar/A
despaltanar/A
papar/A
parecar/A
partiŧionar/A
pastiđar/A
rapatumar/A
pedotar/A
spelegar/A
spénđer/A
despeocar/A
spernacar/A
peteđolar/A
peverar/A
piatonar/A
inpikolir/A
pipar/A
inpiumar/A
replikar/A
pomegar/A
sotopóner/A
apontelar/A
asportar/A
potacar/A
premiar/A
reprexentar/A
provar/A
spurgar/A
radegar/A
ranciñar/A
rasir/A
reditar/A
retribuir/A
iriŧar/A
roersar/A
rondar/A
rotamar/A
rular/A
sabolar/A
resalir/A
samar/A
satiriđar/A
scopetar/A
segatar/A
seitar/A
senbrar/A
raseñar/A
disestar/A
rekonsiderar/A
insiñir/A
skalvar/A
skarsexar/A
skitolar/A
skrinŧar/A
insoaŧar/A
insolfarar/A
insorir/A
spanar/A
spendacar/A
spicar/A
inspiritar/A
spuar/A
istalar/A
restaurar/A
restimar/A
destokar/A
stranxir/A
strisar/A
destuar/A
subir/A
superbir/A
tafiar/A
taketar/A
tapeŧar/A
tasar/A
destegolar/A
intenerir/A
ténxer/A
detèñer/A
tratéñer/A
detestar/A
stirar/A
tolerar/A
torbiar/A
retòrđer/A
sotràer/A
trankuiliđar/A
travar/A
treskar/A
tromentar/A
truskar/A
inŧanpar/A
ŧentrar/A
ŧertar/A
ŧimegar/A
inŧivilir/A
ukelar/A
uxurar/A
vangar/A
invaxar/A
xvejar/A
deventar/A
kontraveñir/A
rinvèñer/A
vernar/A
verxurar/A
viađar/A
dexviscar/A
vodar/A
volponar/A
xvòlxer/A
xbabaŧar/A
xemenar/A
xironar/A
inxoɉelar/A
